Alabama, session 2026rs, SB286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
21 Section 1. Sections 34-43A-1 through 34-43A-19, Code of
22 Alabama 1975, are designated as Article 1 of Chapter 43A of
23 Title 34, Code of Alabama 1975.
24 Section 2. Article 2 of Chapter 43A of Title 34 is
25 added to the Code of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
26 Article 2. INTERSTATE MASSAGE COMPACT
27 §34-43A-40 Purpose.
28 (a) The purpose of this compact is to reduce the
Page 1

(a) The purpose of this compact is to reduce the
SB286 INTRODUCED
29 burdens on state governments and to facilitate the interstate
30 practice and regulation of massage therapy with the goal of
31 improving public access to, and the safety of, massage therapy
32 services. Through this compact, the member states seek to
33 establish a regulatory framework which provides for a new
34 multistate licensing program. Through this additional
35 licensing pathway, the member states seek to provide increased
36 value and mobility to licensed massage therapists in the
37 member states, while ensuring the provision of safe,
38 competent, and reliable services to the public.
39 (b) This compact is designed to achieve the following
40 objectives, and the member states hereby ratify the same
41 intentions by subscribing hereto:
42 (1) Increase public access to massage therapy services
43 by providing for a multistate licensing pathway;
44 (2) Enhance the member states' ability to protect the
45 public's health and safety;
46 (3) Enhance the member states' ability to prevent human
47 trafficking and licensure fraud;
48 (4) Encourage the cooperation of member states in
49 regulating the multistate practice of massage therapy;
50 (5) Support relocating military members and their
51 spouses;
52 (6) Facilitate and enhance the exchange of licensure,
53 investigative, and disciplinary information between the member
54 states;
55 (7) Create an interstate commission that will exist to
56 implement and administer the compact;
Page 2

implement and administer the compact;
SB286 INTRODUCED
57 (8) Allow a member state to hold a licensee
58 accountable, even where that licensee holds a multistate
59 license;
60 (9) Create a streamlined pathway for licensees to
61 practice in member states, thus increasing the mobility of
62 duly licensed massage therapists; and
63 (10) Serve the needs of licensed massage therapists and
64 the public receiving their services.
65 (c) Nothing in this compact is intended to prevent a
66 state from enforcing its own laws regarding the practice of
67 massage therapy.
68 §34-43A-41 Definitions.
69 As used in this compact, except as otherwise provided
70 and subject to clarification by the rules of the commission,
71 the following terms have the following meanings:
72 (1) ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER. Any person with full-time
73 duty status in the Armed Forces of the United States,
74 including members of the National Guard and Reserve.
75 (2) ADVERSE ACTION. Any administrative, civil,
76 equitable, or criminal action permitted by a member state's
77 laws which is imposed by a licensing authority or other
78 regulatory body against a licensee, including actions against
79 an individual's authorization to practice such as revocation,
80 suspension, probation, surrender in lieu of discipline,
81 monitoring of the licensee, limitation of the licensee's
82 practice, or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting an
83 individual's ability to practice massage therapy, including
84 the issuance of a cease and desist order.
Page 3

the issuance of a cease and desist order.
SB286 INTRODUCED
85 (3) ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM. A nondisciplinary monitoring
86 or prosecutorial diversion program approved by a member
87 state's licensing authority.
88 (4) AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE. A legal authorization by
89 a remote state pursuant to a multistate license permitting the
90 practice of massage therapy in that remote state, which shall
91 be subject to the enforcement jurisdiction of the licensing
92 authority in that remote state.
93 (5) BACKGROUND CHECK. The submission of an applicant's
94 criminal history record information, as further defined in 28
95 C.F.R. § 20.3(d), as amended, from the Federal Bureau of
96 Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining state
97 criminal records in the applicant's home state.
98 (6) CHARTER MEMBER STATES. Member states that have
99 enacted legislation to adopt this compact where such
100 legislation predates the effective date of this compact as
101 defined in Section 34-43A-51.
102 (7) COMMISSION. The government agency whose membership
103 consists of all states that have enacted this compact, which
104 is known as the Interstate Massage Compact Commission, as
105 defined in Section 34-43A-47, and which shall operate as an
106 instrumentality of the member states.
107 (8) CONTINUING COMPETENCE. A requirement, as a
108 condition of license renewal, to provide evidence of
109 participation in, and completion of, educational or
110 professional activities that maintain, improve, or enhance
111 massage therapy fitness to practice.
112 (9) CURRENT SIGNIFICANT INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION.
Page 4

(9) CURRENT SIGNIFICANT INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION.
SB286 INTRODUCED
113 Investigative information that a licensing authority, after an
114 inquiry or investigation that complies with a member state's
115 due process requirements, has reason to believe is not
116 groundless and, if proved true, would indicate a violation of
117 that state's laws regarding the practice of massage therapy.
118 (10) DATA SYSTEM. A repository of information about
119 licensees who hold multistate licenses, which may include, but
120 is not limited to, license status, investigative information,
121 and adverse actions.
122 (11) DISQUALIFYING EVENT. Any event that shall
123 disqualify an individual from holding a multistate license
124 under this compact, which the commission may by rule specify.
125 (12) ENCUMBRANCE. A revocation or suspension of, or any
126 limitation or condition on, the full and unrestricted practice
127 of massage therapy by a licensing authority.
128 (13) EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE. A group of delegates elected
129 or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers
130 granted to them by, the commission.
131 (14) HOME STATE. The member state that is a licensee's
132 primary state of residence where the licensee holds an active
133 single-state license.
134 (15) INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION. Information, records,
135 or documents received or generated by a licensing authority
136 pursuant to an investigation or other inquiry.
137 (16) LICENSEE. An individual who currently holds a
138 license from a member state to fully practice massage therapy,
139 whose license is not a student, provisional, temporary,
140 inactive, or other similar status.
Page 5

inactive, or other similar status.
SB286 INTRODUCED
141 (17) LICENSING AUTHORITY. A state's regulatory body
142 responsible for issuing massage therapy licenses or otherwise
143 overseeing the practice of massage therapy in that state.
144 (18) MASSAGE THERAPY, MASSAGE THERAPY SERVICES, and THE
145 PRACTICE OF MASSAGE THERAPY. The care and services provided by
146 a licensee as set forth in the member state's statutes and
147 rules in the state where the services are being provided.
148 (19) MEMBER STATE. Any state that has adopted this
149 compact.
150 (20) MULTISTATE LICENSE. A license that consists of
151 authorizations to practice massage therapy in all remote
152 states pursuant to this compact, which shall be subject to the
153 enforcement jurisdiction of the licensing authority in a
154 licensee's home state.
155 (21) REMOTE STATE. Any member state, other than the
156 licensee's home state.
157 (22) RULE. Any opinion or regulation adopted by the
158 commission under this compact, which shall have the force of
159 law.
160 (23) SINGLE-STATE LICENSE. A current, valid
161 authorization issued by a member state's licensing authority
162 allowing an individual to fully practice massage therapy,
163 which is not a restricted, student, provisional, temporary, or
164 inactive practice authorization and authorizes practice only
165 within the issuing state.
166 (24) STATE. A state, territory, possession of the
167 United States, or the District of Columbia.
168 §34-43A-42 Member State Requirements.
Page 6

§34-43A-42 Member State Requirements.
SB286 INTRODUCED
169 (a) To be eligible to join this compact, and to
170 maintain eligibility as a member state, a state must:
171 (1) License and regulate the practice of massage
172 therapy;
173 (2) Have a mechanism or entity in place to receive and
174 investigate complaints from the public, regulatory or law
175 enforcement agencies, or the commission about licensees
176 practicing in that state;
177 (3) Accept passage of a psychometrically valid national
178 examination as a criterion for massage therapy licensure in
179 that state. For purposes of this compact, the examination
180 shall not include a state-administered examination but shall
181 be inclusive of one of the following:
182 a. The Massage and Bodywork Licensure Examination;
183 b. The National Certification Board for Therapeutic
184 Massage and Bodywork prior to January 1, 2015; or
185 c. The substantial equivalent of the foregoing which
186 the commission may approve by rule;
187 (4) Require that licensees satisfy educational
188 requirements prior to being licensed to provide massage
189 therapy services to the public in that state;
190 (5) Implement procedures for requiring the background
191 check of applicants for a multistate license, and for the
192 reporting of any disqualifying events, including, but not
193 limited to, obtaining and submitting, for each licensee
194 holding a multistate license and each applicant for a
195 multistate license, fingerprint or other biometric-based
196 information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for
Page 7

information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for
SB286 INTRODUCED
197 background checks; receiving the results of the Federal Bureau
198 of Investigation record search on background checks, and
199 considering the results of such a background check in making
200 licensure decisions;
201 (6) Have continuing competence requirements as a
202 condition for license renewal;
203 (7) Participate in the data system, including through
204 the use of unique identifying numbers as described herein;
205 (8) Notify the commission and other member states, in
206 compliance with the terms of the compact and rules of the
207 commission, of any disciplinary action taken by the state
208 against a licensee practicing under a multistate license in
209 that state, or of the existence of investigative information
210 or current significant investigative information regarding a
211 licensee practicing in that state pursuant to a multistate
212 license;
213 (9) Comply with the rules of the commission; and
214 (10) Accept licensees with valid multistate licenses
215 from other member states as established herein.
216 (b) Individuals not residing in a member state shall
217 continue to be able to apply for a member state's single-state
218 license as provided under the laws of each member state.
219 However, the single-state license granted to those individuals
220 shall not be recognized as granting a multistate license for
221 massage therapy in any other member state.
222 (c) Nothing in this compact shall affect the
223 requirements established by a member state for the issuance of
224 a single-state license.
Page 8

a single-state license.
SB286 INTRODUCED
225 (d) A multistate license issued to a licensee shall be
226 recognized by each remote state as an authorization to
227 practice massage therapy in each remote state.
228 §34-43A-43 Multistate License Requirements.
229 (a) To qualify for a multistate license under this
230 compact, and to maintain eligibility for such a license, an
231 applicant must:
232 (1) Hold an active single-state license to practice
233 massage therapy in the applicant's home state;
234 (2) Satisfy one of the following:
235 a. Completion of at least 625 clock hours of massage
236 therapy education;
237 b. Graduation from an educational program that meets
238 the minimum qualifications for licensure in the home state and
239 two years of continuous licensure with a single-state license
240 in good standing in the home state, except as provided in
241 Section 34-43A-46; or
242 c. Satisfaction of the substantial equivalent of the
243 foregoing which the commission may approve by rule;
244 (3) Successfully pass a psychometrically valid national
245 examination for licensure. For purposes of this compact, the
246 examination shall not include a state-administered examination
247 but shall be inclusive of one of the following:
248 a. The Massage and Bodywork Licensure Examination;
249 b. A National Certification Board for Therapeutic
250 Massage & Bodywork licensure examination prior to January 1,
251 2015; or
252 c. The substantial equivalent of the foregoing which
Page 9

c. The substantial equivalent of the foregoing which
SB286 INTRODUCED
253 the commission may approve by rule;
254 (4) Submit to a background check;
255 (5) Have not been convicted or found guilty, or have
256 entered into an agreed disposition, of a felony offense under
257 applicable state or federal criminal law, within five years
258 prior to the date of their application, where such a time
259 period shall not include any time served for the offense, and
260 provided that the applicant has completed any and all
261 requirements arising as a result of any such offense;
262 (6) Have not been convicted or found guilty, or have
263 entered into an agreed disposition, of a misdemeanor offense
264 related to the practice of massage therapy under applicable
265 state or federal criminal law, within two years prior to the
266 date of their application where such a time period shall not
267 include any time served for the offense, and provided that the
268 applicant has completed any and all requirements arising as a
269 result of any such offense;
270 (7) Have not been convicted or found guilty, or have
271 entered into an agreed disposition, of any offense, whether a
272 misdemeanor or a felony, under state or federal law, at any
273 time, relating to any of the following:
274 a. Kidnapping.
275 b. Human trafficking.
276 c. Human smuggling.
277 d. Sexual battery, sexual assault, or any related
278 offenses.
279 e. Any other category of offense which the commission
280 may by rule designate.
Page 10

may by rule designate.
SB286 INTRODUCED
281 (8) Have not previously held a massage therapy license
282 that was revoked by, or surrendered in lieu of discipline to,
283 an applicable licensing authority;
284 (9) Have no history of any adverse action on any
285 occupational or professional license within two years prior to
286 the date of their application; and
287 (10) Pay all required fees.
288 (b) A multistate license granted pursuant to this
289 compact may be effective for a definite period of time
290 concurrent with the renewal of the home state license.
291 (c) A licensee practicing in a member state is subject
292 to all scope of practice laws governing massage therapy
293 services in that state.
294 (d) The practice of massage therapy under a multistate
295 license granted pursuant to this compact will subject the
296 licensee to the jurisdiction of the licensing authority, the
297 courts, and the laws of the member state in which the massage
298 therapy services are provided.
299 §34-43A-44 Authority of Interstate Massage Compact
300 Commission and Member State Licensing Authorities.
301 (a) Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the
302 commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any
303 way reduce the ability of a member state to enact and enforce
304 laws, or other rules related to the practice of massage
305 therapy in that state, where those laws or other rules are not
306 inconsistent with the provisions of this compact.
307 (b) Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the
308 commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any
Page 11

commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any
SB286 INTRODUCED
309 way reduce the ability of a member state to take adverse
310 action against a licensee's single-state license to practice
311 massage therapy in that state.
312 (c) Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the
313 commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any
314 way reduce the ability of a remote state to take adverse
315 action against a licensee's authorization to practice in that
316 state.
317 (d) Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the
318 commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any
319 way reduce the ability of a licensee's home state to take
320 adverse action against a licensee's multistate license based
321 upon information provided by a remote state.
322 (e) Insofar as practical, a member state's licensing
323 authority shall cooperate with the commission and with each
324 entity exercising independent regulatory authority over the
325 practice of massage therapy according to the provisions of
326 this compact.
327 §34-43A-45 Adverse Actions.
328 (a) A licensee's home state shall have exclusive power
329 to impose an adverse action against a licensee's multistate
330 license issued by the home state.
331 (b) A home state may take adverse action on a
332 multistate license based on the investigative information,
333 current significant investigative information, or adverse
334 action of a remote state.
335 (c) A home state shall retain authority to complete any
336 pending investigations of a licensee practicing under a
Page 12

pending investigations of a licensee practicing under a
SB286 INTRODUCED
337 multistate license who changes their home state during the
338 course of such an investigation. The licensing authority shall
339 also be empowered to report the results of such an
340 investigation to the commission through the data system as
341 described herein.
342 (d) Any member state may investigate actual or alleged
343 violations of the scope of practice laws in any other member
344 state for a massage therapist who holds a multistate license.
345 (e) A remote state shall have the authority to:
346 (1) Take adverse actions against a licensee's
347 authorization to practice;
348 (2) Issue cease and desist orders or impose an
349 encumbrance on a licensee's authorization to practice in that
350 state;
351 (3) Issue subpoenas for both hearings and
352 investigations that require the attendance and testimony of
353 witnesses, as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas
354 issued by a licensing authority in a member state for the
355 attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of
356 evidence from another member state shall be enforced in the
357 latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction, according
358 to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to
359 subpoenas issued in proceedings before it. The issuing
360 licensing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel
361 expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service
362 statutes of the state in which the witnesses or evidence are
363 located.
364 (4) If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from
Page 13

(4) If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from
SB286 INTRODUCED
365 the affected licensee the costs of investigations and
366 disposition of cases resulting from any adverse action taken
367 against that licensee; and
368 (5) Take adverse action against the licensee's
369 authorization to practice in that state based on the factual
370 findings of another member state.
371 (f) If an adverse action is taken by the home state
372 against a licensee's multistate license or single-state
373 license to practice in the home state, the licensee's
374 authorization to practice in all other member states shall be
375 deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from the
376 license. All home state disciplinary orders that impose an
377 adverse action against a licensee shall include a statement
378 that the massage therapist's authorization to practice is
379 deactivated in all member states during the pendency of the
380 order.
381 (g) If adverse action is taken by a remote state
382 against a licensee's authorization to practice, that adverse
383 action applies to all authorizations to practice in all remote
384 states. A licensee whose authorization to practice in a remote
385 state is removed for a specified period of time is not
386 eligible to apply for a new multistate license in any other
387 state until the specific time for removal of the authorization
388 to practice has passed and all encumbrance requirements are
389 satisfied.
390 (h) Nothing in this compact shall override a member
391 state's authority to accept a licensee's participation in an
392 alternative program in lieu of adverse action. A licensee's
Page 14

alternative program in lieu of adverse action. A licensee's
SB286 INTRODUCED
393 multistate license shall be suspended for the duration of the
394 licensee's participation in any alternative program.
395 (i) Joint Investigations.
396 (1) In addition to the authority granted to a member
397 state by its respective scope of practice laws or other
398 applicable state law, a member state may participate with
399 other member states in joint investigations of licensees.
400 (2) Member states shall share any investigative,
401 litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any
402 joint or individual investigation initiated under the compact.
403 §34-43A-46 Active Military Members and Their Spouses.
404 Active military members, or their spouses, shall
405 designate a home state where the individual has a current
406 license to practice massage therapy in good standing. The
407 individual may retain his or her home state designation during
408 any period of service when that individual or spouse is on
409 active-duty assignment. Further, active military members or
410 their spouses shall satisfy the requirements of Section
411 34-43A-43(a)(2) by successful graduation from an educational
412 program that meets the minimum qualifications for licensure in
413 the designated home state.
414 §34-43A-47 Establishment and Operation of Interstate
415 Massage Compact Commission.
416 (a) The compact member states hereby create and
417 establish a joint government agency whose membership consists
418 of all member states that have enacted the compact known as
419 the Interstate Massage Compact Commission. The commission is
420 an instrumentality of the compact states acting jointly and
Page 15

an instrumentality of the compact states acting jointly and
SB286 INTRODUCED
421 not an instrumentality of any one state. The commission shall
422 come into existence on or after the effective date of the
423 compact as set forth in Section 34-43A-51.
424 (b) Membership, Voting, and Meetings.
425 (1) Each member state shall have and be limited to one
426 delegate selected by that member state's licensing authority.
427 (2) The delegate shall be either:
428 a. A member of the state licensing authority; or
429 b. The primary administrative officer of the state
430 licensing authority or his or her designee.
431 (3) The commission, by rule or bylaw, shall establish a
432 term of office for delegates and, by rule or bylaw, may
433 establish term limits.
434 (4) The commission may recommend removal or suspension
435 of any delegate from office.
436 (5) A member state's licensing authority shall fill any
437 vacancy of its delegate occurring on the commission within 60
438 days of the vacancy.
439 (6) Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all
440 matters that are voted on by the commission.
441 (7) The commission shall meet at least once during each
442 calendar year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in
443 the bylaws. The commission may meet by telecommunication,
444 video conference, or other similar electronic means.
445 (c) The commission shall have the following powers:
446 (1) Establish the fiscal year of the commission.
447 (2) Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest
448 policies.
Page 16

policies.
SB286 INTRODUCED
449 (3) Adopt rules and bylaws.
450 (4) Maintain its financial records in accordance with
451 the bylaws.
452 (5) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with
453 the provisions of this compact, the commission's rules, and
454 the bylaws.
455 (6) Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions
456 in the name of the commission, provided that the standing of
457 any licensing authority to sue or be sued under applicable law
458 shall not be affected.
459 (7) Maintain and certify records and information
460 provided to a member state as the authenticated business
461 records of the commission, and designate an agent to do so on
462 the commission's behalf.
463 (8) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds.
464 (9) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of
465 personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a
466 member state.
467 (10) Conduct an annual financial review.
468 (11) Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix
469 compensation, define duties, grant such individuals
470 appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the
471 compact, and establish the commission's personnel policies and
472 programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of
473 personnel, and other related personnel matters.
474 (12) Assess and collect fees.
475 (13) Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations,
476 grants of money, other sources of revenue, equipment,
Page 17

grants of money, other sources of revenue, equipment,
SB286 INTRODUCED
477 supplies, materials, and services, and receive, utilize, and
478 dispose of the same, provided that at all times the commission
479 shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of
480 interest.
481 (14) Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or
482 use any property, real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided
483 interest therein.
484 (15) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange,
485 abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal,
486 or mixed.
487 (16) Establish a budget and make expenditures.
488 (17) Borrow money.
489 (18) Appoint committees, including standing committees,
490 composed of members, state regulators, state legislators or
491 their representatives, and consumer representatives, and other
492 interested persons as may be designated in this compact and
493 the bylaws.
494 (19) The commission may elect up to two ex officio,
495 nonvoting members of the commission as specified in the
496 commission's bylaws.
497 (20) Accept and transmit complaints from the public,
498 regulatory or law enforcement agencies, or the commission to
499 the relevant member state or member states regarding potential
500 misconduct of licensees.
501 (21) Elect a chair, vice chair, secretary, and
502 treasurer and such other officers of the commission as
503 provided in the commission's bylaws.
504 (22) Establish and elect an executive committee,
Page 18

(22) Establish and elect an executive committee,
SB286 INTRODUCED
505 including a chair and a vice chair.
506 (23) Adopt and provide to the member states an annual
507 report.
508 (24) Determine whether a state's adopted language is
509 materially different from the model compact language such that
510 the state would not qualify for participation in the compact.
511 (25) Perform such other functions that may be necessary
512 or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact.
513 (d) The Executive Committee.
514 (1) The executive committee shall have the power to act
515 on behalf of the commission according to the terms of this
516 compact. The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the
517 executive committee shall include:
518 a. Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the
519 administration of the compact including compliance with the
520 provisions of the compact, the commission's rules and bylaws,
521 and other such duties as deemed necessary;
522 b. Recommending to the commission changes to the rules
523 or bylaws, changes to this compact legislation, fees charged
524 to compact member states, fees charged to licensees, and other
525 fees;
526 c. Ensuring compact administration services are
527 appropriately provided, including by contract;
528 d. Preparing and recommending the budget;
529 e. Maintaining financial records on behalf of the
530 commission;
531 f. Monitoring compact compliance of member states and
532 providing compliance reports to the commission;
Page 19

providing compliance reports to the commission;
SB286 INTRODUCED
533 g. Establishing additional committees as necessary;
534 h. Exercising the powers and duties of the commission
535 during the interim between commission meetings, except for
536 adopting or amending rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and
537 exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to
538 the commission by rule or bylaw; and
539 i. Other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of
540 the commission.
541 (2) The executive committee shall be composed of seven
542 voting members as follows:
543 a. The chair and vice chair of the commission and any
544 other members of the commission who serve on the executive
545 committee shall be voting members of the executive committee.
546 b. Other than the chair, vice chair, secretary, and
547 treasurer, the commission shall elect three voting members
548 from the current membership of the commission.
549 (3) The commission may remove any member of the
550 executive committee as provided in the commission's bylaws.
551 (4) The executive committee shall meet at least
552 annually.
553 a. Executive committee meetings shall be open to the
554 public, except that the executive committee may meet in a
555 closed, nonpublic session of a public meeting when dealing
556 with any of the matters covered under subdivision (f)(4).
557 b. The executive committee shall give five business
558 days' advance notice of its public meetings, posted on its
559 website and as determined to provide notice to persons with an
560 interest in the public matters the executive committee intends
Page 20

interest in the public matters the executive committee intends
SB286 INTRODUCED
561 to address at those meetings.
562 (5) The executive committee may hold an emergency
563 meeting when acting for the commission to:
564 a. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
565 welfare;
566 b. Prevent a loss of commission or participating state
567 funds; or
568 c. Protect public health and safety.
569 (e) The commission shall adopt and provide to the
570 member states an annual report.
571 (f) Meetings of the commission.
572 (1) All meetings of the commission that are not closed
573 pursuant to this subsection shall be open to the public.
574 Notice of public meetings shall be posted on the commission's
575 website at least 30 days prior to the public meeting.
576 (2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1), the commission may
577 convene an emergency public meeting by providing at least 24
578 hours' prior notice on the commission's website, and any other
579 means as provided in the commission's rules, for any of the
580 reasons it may dispense with notice of proposed rulemaking
581 under Section 34-43A-49(l). The commission's legal counsel
582 shall certify the that one of the reasons justifying an
583 emergency public meeting has been met.
584 (3) Notice of all commission meetings shall provide the
585 time, date, and location of the meeting, and if the meeting is
586 to be held or accessible via telecommunication, video
587 conference, or other electronic means, the notice shall
588 include the mechanism for access to the meeting.
Page 21

include the mechanism for access to the meeting.
SB286 INTRODUCED
589 (4) The commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic
590 meeting for the commission to discuss:
591 a. Noncompliance of a member state with its obligations
592 under the compact;
593 b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
594 matters, practices or procedures related to specific
595 employees, or other matters related to the commission's
596 internal personnel practices and procedures;
597 c. Current or threatened discipline of a licensee by
598 the commission or by a member state's licensing authority;
599 d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
600 litigation;
601 e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or
602 sale of goods, services, or real estate;
603 f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
604 any person;
605 g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information
606 that is privileged or confidential;
607 h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure
608 would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal
609 privacy;
610 i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement
611 purposes;
612 j. Information related to any investigative reports
613 prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the commission or
614 other committee charged with responsibility of investigation
615 or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the compact;
616 k. Legal advice;
Page 22

k. Legal advice;
SB286 INTRODUCED
617 l. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the
618 public by federal or member state law; or
619 m. Other matters as adopted by the commission by rule.
620 (5) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed,
621 the presiding officer shall state that the meeting will be
622 closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and
623 the reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
624 (6) The commission shall keep minutes that fully and
625 clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall
626 provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
627 reasons therefore, including a description of the views
628 expressed. All documents considered in connection with an
629 action shall be identified in the minutes. All minutes and
630 documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject
631 to release only by a majority vote of the commission or order
632 of a court of competent jurisdiction.
633 (g) Financing of the commission.
634 (1) The commission shall pay, or provide for the
635 payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment,
636 organization, and ongoing activities.
637 (2) The commission may accept any and all appropriate
638 sources of revenue, donations, and grants of money, equipment,
639 supplies, materials, and services.
640 (3) The commission may levy on and collect an annual
641 assessment from each member state and impose fees on licensees
642 of member states to whom it grants a multistate license to
643 cover the cost of the operations and activities of the
644 commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount
Page 23

commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount
SB286 INTRODUCED
645 sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year
646 for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The
647 aggregate annual assessment amount for member states shall be
648 allocated based upon a formula that the commission shall adopt
649 by rule.
650 (4) The commission shall not incur obligations of any
651 kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same;
652 nor shall the commission pledge the credit of any member
653 states, except by and with the authority of the member state.
654 (5) The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
655 receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of
656 the commission shall be subject to the financial review and
657 accounting procedures established under its bylaws. All
658 receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission
659 shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified
660 or licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial
661 review shall be included in and become part of the annual
662 report of the commission.
663 (h) Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification.
664 (1) The members, officers, executive director,
665 employees, and representatives of the commission shall be
666 immune from suit and liability, both personally and in their
667 official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of
668 property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by
669 or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or
670 omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the
671 claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
672 within the scope of commission employment, duties, or
Page 24

within the scope of commission employment, duties, or
SB286 INTRODUCED
673 responsibilities, provided that nothing in this paragraph
674 shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or
675 liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by
676 the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
677 person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the
678 commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the
679 immunity granted hereunder.
680 (2) The commission shall defend any member, officer,
681 executive director, employee, and representative of the
682 commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability
683 arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission
684 that occurred within the scope of commission employment,
685 duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the
686 commission that the person against whom the claim is made had
687 a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
688 commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided
689 that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person
690 from retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and
691 provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission
692 did not result from that person's intentional or willful or
693 wanton misconduct.
694 (3) The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless
695 any member, officer, executive director, employee, and
696 representative of the commission for the amount of any
697 settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising
698 out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that
699 occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or
700 responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis
Page 25

responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis
SB286 INTRODUCED
701 for believing occurred within the scope of commission
702 employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the
703 actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from
704 the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
705 person.
706 (4) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation
707 on the liability of any licensee for professional malpractice
708 or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other
709 applicable state laws.
710 (5) Nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to
711 waive or otherwise abrogate a member state's state action
712 immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect to
713 antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any
714 other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law,
715 regulation, or rule.
716 (6) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a
717 waiver of sovereign immunity by the member states or by the
718 commission.
719 §34-43A-48 Data System.
720 (a) The commission shall provide for the development,
721 maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated
722 database and reporting system.
723 (b) The commission shall assign each applicant for a
724 multistate license a unique identifier, as determined by the
725 rules of the commission.
726 (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to
727 the contrary, a member state shall submit a uniform data set
728 to the data system on all individuals to whom this compact is
Page 26

to the data system on all individuals to whom this compact is
SB286 INTRODUCED
729 applicable as required by the rules of the commission,
730 including:
731 (1) Identifying information;
732 (2) Licensure data;
733 (3) Adverse actions against a licensee and information
734 related thereto;
735 (4) Nonconfidential information related to alternative
736 program participation, the beginning and ending dates of the
737 participation, and other information related to the
738 participation;
739 (5) Any denial of application for licensure, and the
740 reason or reasons for the denial, excluding the reporting of
741 any criminal history record information where prohibited by
742 law;
743 (6) The existence of investigative information;
744 (7) The existence of current significant investigative
745 information; and
746 (8) Other information that may facilitate the
747 administration of this compact or the protection of the
748 public, as determined by the rules of the commission.
749 (d) The records and information provided to a member
750 state pursuant to this compact or through the data system,
751 when certified by the commission or an agent thereof, shall
752 constitute the authenticated business records of the
753 commission, and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay
754 exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or
755 administrative proceedings in a member state.
756 (e) The existence of current significant investigative
Page 27

(e) The existence of current significant investigative
SB286 INTRODUCED
757 information and the existence of investigative information
758 pertaining to a licensee in any member state will only be
759 available to other member states.
760 (f) It is the responsibility of the member states to
761 report any adverse action against a licensee who holds a
762 multistate license and to monitor the database to determine
763 whether adverse action has been taken against such a licensee
764 or license applicant. Adverse action information pertaining to
765 a licensee or license applicant in any member state shall be
766 available to any other member state.
767 (g) Member states contributing information to the data
768 system may designate information that may not be shared with
769 the public without the express permission of the contributing
770 state.
771 (h) Any information submitted to the data system that
772 is subsequently expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws
773 of the member state contributing the information shall be
774 removed from the data system.
775 §34-43A-49 Rulemaking.
776 (a) The commission shall adopt reasonable rules in
777 order to effectively and efficiently implement and administer
778 the purposes and provisions of the compact. A rule shall be
779 invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of
780 competent jurisdiction holds that the rule is invalid because
781 the commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner
782 that is beyond the scope and purposes of the compact, or the
783 powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable
784 standard of review.
Page 28

standard of review.
SB286 INTRODUCED
785 (b) The rules of the commission shall have the force of
786 law in each member state, provided, however, that where the
787 rules of the commission conflict with the laws of the member
788 state that establish the member state's scope of practice as
789 held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the rules of the
790 commission shall be ineffective in that state to the extent of
791 the conflict.
792 (c) The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers
793 pursuant to the criteria set forth in this section and the
794 rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding as of the
795 date specified by the commission for each rule.
796 (d) If a majority of the legislatures of the member
797 states rejects a rule or portion of a rule, by enactment of a
798 statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the
799 compact within four years of the date of adoption of the rule,
800 then the rule shall have no further force and effect in any
801 member state or to any state applying to participate in the
802 compact.
803 (e) Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special
804 meeting of the commission.
805 (f) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the
806 commission shall hold a public hearing and allow persons to
807 provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and
808 arguments.
809 (g) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule by the
810 commission, and at least 30 days in advance of the meeting at
811 which the commission will hold a public hearing on the
812 proposed rule, the commission shall provide a notice of
Page 29

proposed rule, the commission shall provide a notice of
SB286 INTRODUCED
813 proposed rulemaking:
814 (1) On the website of the commission or other publicly
815 accessible platform;
816 (2) To persons who have requested notice of the
817 commission's notices of proposed rulemaking; and
818 (3) In other ways that the commission, by rule, may
819 specify.
820 (h) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
821 (1) The time, date, and location of the public hearing
822 at which the commission will hear public comments on the
823 proposed rule and, if different, the time, date, and location
824 of the meeting where the commission will consider and vote on
825 the proposed rule;
826 (2) If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video
827 conference, or other electronic means, the commission shall
828 include the mechanism for access to the hearing in the notice
829 of proposed rulemaking;
830 (3) The text of the proposed rule and the reason
831 therefor;
832 (4) A request for comments on the proposed rule from
833 any interested person; and
834 (5) The manner in which interested persons may submit
835 written comments.
836 (i) All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the
837 recording and all written comments and documents received by
838 the commission in response to the proposed rule shall be
839 available to the public.
840 (j) Nothing in this section shall be construed as
Page 30

(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed as
SB286 INTRODUCED
841 requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be
842 grouped for the convenience of the commission at hearings
843 required by this section.
844 (k) The commission shall, by majority vote of all
845 commissioners, take final action on the proposed rule based on
846 the rulemaking record.
847 (1) The commission may adopt changes to the proposed
848 rule, provided the changes do not enlarge the original purpose
849 of the proposed rule.
850 (2) The commission shall provide an explanation of the
851 reasons for substantive changes made to the proposed rule as
852 well as reasons for substantive changes not made that were
853 recommended by commenters.
854 (3) The commission shall determine a reasonable
855 effective date for the rule. Except for an emergency as
856 provided in subsection (l), the effective date of the rule
857 shall be no sooner than 30 days after the commission issuing
858 the notice that it adopted or amended the rule.
859 (l) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the
860 commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule with 24
861 hours' notice, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures
862 provided in the compact and in this section shall be
863 retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably
864 possible, in no event later than 90 days after the effective
865 date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an
866 emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately to:
867 (1) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety,
868 or welfare;
Page 31

or welfare;
SB286 INTRODUCED
869 (2) Prevent a loss of commission or member state funds;
870 (3) Meet a deadline for the adoption of a rule that is
871 established by federal law or rule; or
872 (4) Protect public health and safety.
873 (m) The commission or an authorized committee of the
874 commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule
875 for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in
876 format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public
877 notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the
878 commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any
879 person for a period of 30 days after posting. The revision may
880 be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a
881 material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in
882 writing and delivered to the commission prior to the end of
883 the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will
884 take effect without further action. If the revision is
885 challenged, the revision may not take effect without the
886 approval of the commission.
887 (n) No member state's rulemaking requirements shall
888 apply under this compact.
889 §34-43A-50 Oversight, Dispute Resolution, and
890 Enforcement.
891 (a) Oversight.
892 (1) The executive and judicial branches of state
893 government in each member state shall enforce this compact and
894 take all actions necessary and appropriate to implement the
895 compact.
896 (2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or
Page 32

(2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or
SB286 INTRODUCED
897 against the commission shall be brought solely and exclusively
898 in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal
899 office of the commission is located. The commission may waive
900 venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or
901 consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution
902 proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the
903 selection or propriety of venue in any action against a
904 licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such
905 similar matter.
906 (3) The commission shall be entitled to receive service
907 of process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or
908 interpretation of the compact and shall have standing to
909 intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to
910 provide the commission service of process shall render a
911 judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact, or
912 adopted rules.
913 (b) Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination.
914 (1) If the commission determines that a member state
915 has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or
916 responsibilities under this compact or the adopted rules, the
917 commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting
918 state. The notice of default shall describe the default, the
919 proposed means of curing the default, and any other action
920 that the commission may take, and shall offer training and
921 specific technical assistance regarding the default.
922 (2) The commission shall provide a copy of the notice
923 of default to the other member states.
924 (c) If a state in default fails to cure the default,
Page 33

(c) If a state in default fails to cure the default,
SB286 INTRODUCED
925 the defaulting state may be terminated from the compact upon
926 an affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of the
927 member states, and all rights, privileges, and benefits
928 conferred on that state by this compact may be terminated on
929 the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does
930 not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities
931 incurred during the period of default.
932 (d) Termination of membership in the compact shall be
933 imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have
934 been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall
935 be given by the commission to the Governor, the majority and
936 minority leaders of the defaulting state's legislature, the
937 defaulting state's licensing authority, and each of the member
938 states' licensing authority.
939 (e) A state that has been terminated is responsible for
940 all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through
941 the effective date of termination, including obligations that
942 extend beyond the effective date of termination.
943 (f) Upon the termination of a state's membership from
944 this compact, that state shall immediately provide notice to
945 all licensees who hold a multistate license within that state
946 of the termination. The terminated state shall continue to
947 recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this compact for a
948 minimum of 180 days after the date of the notice of
949 termination.
950 (g) The commission shall not bear any costs related to
951 a state that is found to be in default or that has been
952 terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in writing
Page 34

terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in writing
SB286 INTRODUCED
953 between the commission and the defaulting state.
954 (h) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the
955 commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the
956 District of Columbia or the federal district where the
957 commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party
958 shall be awarded all costs of the litigation, including
959 reasonable attorney fees.
960 (i) Dispute Resolution.
961 (1) Upon request by a member state, the commission
962 shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact that
963 arise among member states and between member and nonmember
964 states.
965 (2) The commission shall adopt a rule providing for
966 both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as
967 appropriate.
968 (j) Enforcement.
969 (1) The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its
970 discretion, shall enforce the provisions of this compact and
971 the commission's rules.
972 (2) By majority vote as provided by commission rule,
973 the commission may initiate legal action against a member
974 state in default in the U.S. District Court for the District
975 of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has
976 its principal offices to enforce compliance with the
977 provisions of the compact and its adopted rules. The relief
978 sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the
979 event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party
980 shall be awarded all costs of the litigation, including
Page 35

shall be awarded all costs of the litigation, including
SB286 INTRODUCED
981 reasonable attorney fees. The remedies herein shall not be the
982 exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may
983 pursue any other remedies available under federal or the
984 defaulting member state's law.
985 (3) A member state may initiate legal action against
986 the commission in the U.S. District Court for the District of
987 Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its
988 principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of
989 the compact and its adopted rules. The relief sought may
990 include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event
991 judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall
992 be awarded all costs of the litigation, including reasonable
993 attorney fees.
994 (4) No individual or entity other than a member state
995 may enforce this compact against the commission.
996 §34-43A-51 Effective Date, Withdrawal, and Amendment.
997 (a) The compact shall come into effect on the date on
998 which the compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh
999 member state.
1000 (1) On or after the effective date of the compact, the
1001 commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of
1002 the charter member states to determine if the statute enacted
1003 by each charter member state is materially different than the
1004 model compact statute.
1005 a. A charter member state whose enactment is found to
1006 be materially different from the model compact statute shall
1007 be entitled to the default process set forth in Section
1008 34-43A-50.
Page 36

34-43A-50.
SB286 INTRODUCED
1009 b. If any member state is later found to be in default,
1010 or is terminated or withdraws from the compact, the commission
1011 shall remain in existence and the compact shall remain in
1012 effect even if the number of member states should be less than
1013 seven.
1014 (2) Member states enacting the compact subsequent to
1015 the charter member states shall be subject to the process set
1016 forth in Section 34-43A-47(c)(24) to determine if their
1017 enactments are materially different from the model compact
1018 statute and whether they qualify for participation in the
1019 compact.
1020 (3) All actions taken for the benefit of the commission
1021 or in furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the
1022 compact prior to the effective date of the compact or the
1023 commission coming into existence shall be considered to be
1024 actions of the commission unless specifically repudiated by
1025 the commission.
1026 (4) Any state that joins the compact shall be subject
1027 to the commission's rules and bylaws as they exist on the date
1028 on which the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that
1029 has been previously adopted by the commission shall have the
1030 full force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes
1031 law in that state.
1032 (b) Any member state may withdraw from this compact by
1033 enacting a statute repealing that state's enactment of the
1034 compact.
1035 (1) A member state's withdrawal shall not take effect
1036 until 180 days after enactment of the repealing statute.
Page 37

until 180 days after enactment of the repealing statute.
SB286 INTRODUCED
1037 (2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing
1038 requirement of the withdrawing state's licensing authority to
1039 comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting
1040 requirements of this compact prior to the effective date of
1041 withdrawal.
1042 (3) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from
1043 this compact, a state shall immediately provide notice of the
1044 withdrawal to all licensees within that state. Notwithstanding
1045 any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, the
1046 withdrawing state shall continue to recognize all licenses
1047 granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of 180 days
1048 after the date of the notice of withdrawal.
1049 (c) Nothing contained in this compact shall be
1050 construed to invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement or
1051 other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a
1052 non-member state that does not conflict with the provisions of
1053 this compact.
1054 (d) This compact may be amended by the member states.
1055 No amendment to this compact shall become effective and
1056 binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the
1057 laws of all member states.
1058 §34-43A-52 Construction and Severability.
1059 (a) This compact and the commission's rulemaking
1060 authority shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the
1061 purposes, and the implementation and administration of the
1062 compact. Provisions of the compact expressly authorizing or
1063 requiring the adoption of rules shall not be construed to
1064 limit the commission's rulemaking authority solely for those
Page 38

limit the commission's rulemaking authority solely for those
SB286 INTRODUCED
1065 purposes.
1066 (b) The provisions of this compact shall be severable,
1067 and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this
1068 compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be
1069 contrary to the constitution of any member state, a state
1070 seeking participation in the compact, or of the United States,
1071 or the applicability thereof to any government, agency,
1072 person, or circumstance, is held to be unconstitutional by a
1073 court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder
1074 of this compact and the applicability thereof to any other
1075 government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be
1076 affected thereby.
1077 (c) Notwithstanding subsection (b), the commission may
1078 deny a state's participation in the compact or, in accordance
1079 with the requirements of Section 34-43A-50(b), terminate a
1080 member state's participation in the compact, if it determines
1081 that a constitutional requirement of a member state is a
1082 material departure from the compact. Otherwise, if this
1083 compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of
1084 any member state, the compact shall remain in full force and
1085 effect as to the remaining member states and in full force and
1086 effect as to the member state affected as to all severable
1087 matters.
1088 §34-43A-53 Consistent Effect and Conflict With Other
1089 State Laws.
1090 (a) Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the
1091 enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not
1092 inconsistent with the compact.
Page 39

inconsistent with the compact.
SB286 INTRODUCED
1093 (b) Any laws, statutes, rules, or other legal
1094 requirements in a member state in conflict with the compact
1095 are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
1096 (c) All permissible agreements between the commission
1097 and the member states are binding in accordance with their
1098 terms.
1099 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1100 1, 2026.
Page 40